Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-814
Uniformity of application and construction.

The Uniform Voidable Transactions Act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

Laws 2019, LB70, § 14.